Hawaii, session 2025, SB545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    School meals; synthetic substances; prohibited.  (a)  The department shall not use synthetic substances in school meals available under the school meals program. For the purposes of this section, "synthetic substances" means food coloring, color additive, or colorant that imparts color when added to food or beverages." SECTION 2.  Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302D-    School meals; synthetic substances; prohibited.  (a)  The department shall not use synthetic substances in school meals available under a school meals program at a charter school. For the purposes of this section, "synthetic substances" means food coloring, color additive, or colorant that imparts color when added to food or beverages." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________